Ohio, session 136, HB923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2929.15, 2929.16, 2929.25, 2967.131, and 2967.15 be amended and section 2903.217 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2903.217. (A) If an offender is subject to post-release control, the adult parole authority may file for a post-conviction no contact order under this section on behalf of a victim, with or without the victim's consent, in the common pleas court of the county in which the offender resides. (B) A motion for a post-conviction no contact order under this section shall include documentation of the offender's conditions of post-release control, including any existing no contact orders or other terms set by the adult parole authority. (C)(1) As soon as possible after the filing of a motion that requests the issuance of a post-conviction no contact order under this section, but not later than the next day that the court is in session after the filing of the motion, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether to issue the order. The adult parole authority officer or agent who requested the order shall appear before the court and provide the court with the information that it requests concerning the basis of the motion. (2) If the court finds that the safety and protection of the alleged victim may be impaired by the continued presence of the alleged offender, the court shall issue a post-conviction no contact order under this section that contains terms designed to ensure the safety and protection of the alleged victim, including a requirement that the alleged offender refrain from entering the residence, school, business, or place of employment of the alleged victim. (3) If the court issues a post-conviction no contact order under this section that includes a requirement that the alleged offender refrain from entering the residence, school, business, or place of employment of the alleged victim, the order shall clearly state that the order cannot be waived or nullified by an invitation to the alleged offender from the alleged victim, or a family or household member to enter the residence, school, business, or place of employment or by the alleged offender's entry into one of those places otherwise upon the consent of the alleged victim, or a family or household member. (4)(a) If the court issues a post-conviction no contact order under this section as an ex parte order, it shall conduct, as soon as possible after the issuance of the order but not later than a date that is within ten court days after the ex parte hearing, a hearing to determine whether the order should remain in effect, be modified, or be revoked. The court shall give the alleged offender notice of, and an opportunity to be heard at, the full hearing and shall hold the full hearing on the date scheduled under this division unless the court grants a continuance of the hearing in accordance with this division. Under any of the following circumstances or for any of the following reasons, the court may grant a continuance of the full hearing to a reasonable time determined by the court: (i) Prior to the date scheduled for the full hearing under this division, the alleged offender has not been served with the petition filed pursuant to this section and notice of the full hearing. (ii) The parties consent to the continuance. (iii) The continuance is needed to allow a party to obtain counsel. (iv) The continuance is needed for other good cause. (b) An ex parte order issued under this section does not expire because of a failure to serve notice of the full hearing upon the alleged offender before the date set for the full hearing or because the court grants a continuance. (5) If the adult parole authority does not request an ex parte order, or the adult parole authority requests an ex parte order but the court does not issue an ex parte order after an ex parte hearing, the court shall proceed as in a normal civil action and grant a full hearing on the matter. (D)(1) A copy of a post-conviction no contact order that is issued under this section shall be issued by the court to the adult parole authority, to the alleged victim, to the alleged offender, and to all law enforcement agencies that have jurisdiction to enforce the order. The court shall direct that a copy of the order be delivered to the alleged offender on the same day that the order is entered. (2) All law enforcement agencies shall establish and maintain an index for the post-conviction no contact orders delivered to the agencies pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section. With respect to each order delivered, each agency shall note on the index the date and time of the agency's receipt of the order. (3) Regardless of whether the adult parole authority has registered the post-conviction no contact order in the county in which the officer's agency has jurisdiction, any officer of a law enforcement agency shall enforce a post-conviction no contact order issued pursuant to this section in accordance with the provisions of the order. Sec. 2929.15. (A)(1) If in sentencing an offender for a felony the court is not required to impose a prison term, a mandatory prison term, or a term of life imprisonment upon the offender, the court may directly impose a sentence that consists of one or more community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code. If the court is sentencing an offender for a fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, in addition to the mandatory term of local incarceration imposed under that division and the mandatory fine required by division (B)(3) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, the court may impose upon the offender a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions in accordance with sections 2929.16 and 2929.17 of the Revised Code. If the court is sentencing an offender for a third or fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, in addition to the mandatory prison term or mandatory prison term and additional prison term imposed under that division, the court also may impose upon the offender a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions under section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. The duration of all community control sanctions imposed on an offender under this division shall not exceed five years. If the offender absconds or otherwise leaves the jurisdiction of the court in which the offender resides without obtaining permission from the court or the offender's probation officer to leave the jurisdiction of the court, or if the offender is confined in any institution for the commission of any offense while under a community control sanction, the period of the community control sanction ceases to run until the offender is brought before the court for its further action. If the court sentences the offender to one or more nonresidential sanctions under section 2929.17 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose as a condition of the nonresidential sanctions that, during the period of the sanctions, the offender must abide by the law and must not leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. The court may impose any other conditions of release under a community control sanction that the court considers appropriate, including, but not limited to, requiring that the offender not ingest or be injected with a drug of abuse and submit to random drug testing as provided in division (D) of this section to determine whether the offender ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse and requiring that the results of the drug test indicate that the offender did not ingest or was not injected with a drug of abuse. (2)(a) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, the court shall place the offender under the general control and supervision of a department of probation in the county that serves the court for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any condition of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. Alternatively, if the offender resides in another county and a county department of probation has been established in that county or that county is served by a multicounty probation department established under section 2301.27 of the Revised Code, the court may request the court of common pleas of that county to receive the offender into the general control and supervision of that county or multicounty department of probation for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any condition of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, subject to the jurisdiction of the trial judge over and with respect to the person of the offender, and to the rules governing that department of probation. If there is no department of probation in the county that serves the court, the court shall place the offender, regardless of the offender's county of residence, under the general control and supervision of the adult parole authority, unless the court has entered into an agreement with the authority as described in division (B) or (C) of section 2301.32 of the Revised Code, or under an entity authorized under division (B) of section 2301.27 of the Revised Code to provide probation and supervisory services to counties for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. (b) If the court imposing sentence on an offender sentences the offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, and if the offender violates any condition of the sanctions, violates any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, violates any law, or departs the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the public or private person or entity that operates or administers the sanction or the program or activity that comprises the sanction shall report the violation or departure directly to the sentencing court, or shall report the violation or departure to the county or multicounty department of probation with general control and supervision over the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section or the officer of that department who supervises the offender, or, if there is no such department with general control and supervision over the offender under that division, to the adult parole authority unless the court has entered into an agreement with the authority as described in division (B) or (C) of section 2301.32 of the Revised Code, or to an entity authorized under division (B) of section 2301.27 of the Revised Code to provide probation and supervisory services to the county. If the public or private person or entity that operates or administers the sanction or the program or activity that comprises the sanction reports the violation or departure to the county or multicounty department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity providing probation and supervisory services to the county, the department's, authority's, or other entity's officers may treat the offender as if the offender were on probation and in violation of the probation, and shall report the violation of the condition of the sanction, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, the violation of law, or the departure from the state without the required permission to the sentencing court. (3) If an offender who is eligible for community control sanctions under this section admits to having a drug addiction or the court has reason to believe that the offender has a drug addiction, and if the offense for which the offender is being sentenced was related to the addiction, the court may require that the offender be assessed by a properly credentialed professional within a specified period of time and shall require the professional to file a written assessment of the offender with the court. If a court imposes treatment and recovery support services as a community control sanction, the court shall direct the level and type of treatment and recovery support services after consideration of the written assessment, if available at the time of sentencing, and recommendations of the professional and other treatment and recovery support services providers. (4) If an assessment completed pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section indicates that the offender has an addiction to drugs or alcohol, the court may include in any community control sanction imposed for a violation of section 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.36, or 2925.37 of the Revised Code a requirement that the offender participate in alcohol and drug addiction services and recovery supports certified under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code or offered by a properly credentialed community addiction services provider. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, if the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony are violated or if the offender violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the sentencing court may impose on the violator one or more of the following penalties: (a) A longer time under the same sanction if the total time under the sanctions does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A) of this section; (b) A more restrictive sanction under section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, including but not limited to, a new term in a community-based correctional facility, halfway house, work-release program, or jail pursuant to division (A)(6) of section 2929.16 of the Revised Code; (c) A prison term on the offender pursuant to section 2929.14 of the Revised Code and division (B)(3) of this section, provided that a prison term imposed under this division is subject to the following limitations and rules, as applicable: (i) If the prison term is imposed for any technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fifth degree, the prison term shall not exceed ninety days, provided that if the remaining period of community control at the time of the violation or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence at that time is less than ninety days, the prison term shall not exceed the length of the remaining period of community control or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence. If the court imposes a prison term as described in this division, division (B)(2)(b) of this section applies. (ii) If the prison term is imposed for any technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fourth degree that is not an offense of violence and is not a sexually oriented offense, the prison term shall not exceed one hundred eighty days, provided that if the remaining period of the community control at the time of the violation or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence at that time is less than one hundred eighty days, the prison term shall not exceed the length of the remaining period of community control or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence. If the court imposes a prison term as described in this division, division (B)(2)(b) of this section applies. (iii) A court is not limited in the number of times it may sentence an offender to a prison term under division (B)(1)(c) of this section for a violation of the conditions of a community control sanction or for a violation of a law or leaving the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. If an offender who is under a community control sanction violates the conditions of the sanction or violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, is sentenced to a prison term for the violation or conduct, is released from the term after serving it, and subsequently violates the conditions of the sanction or violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the court may impose a new prison term sanction on the offender under division (B)(1)(c) of this section for the subsequent violation or conduct. (2)(a) If an offender was acting pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2925.11 or a related provision of section 2925.12, 2925.14, or 2925.141 of the Revised Code and in so doing violated the conditions of a community control sanction based on a minor drug possession offense, as defined in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code, or violated section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall not impose any of the penalties described in division (B)(1) of this section based on the violation. (b) If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(c)(i) or (ii) of this section for a technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction, one of the following is applicable with respect to the time that the offender spends in prison under the term: (i) Subject to division (B)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, it shall be credited against the offender's community control sanction that was being served at the time of the violation, and the remaining time under that community control sanction shall be reduced by the time that the offender spends in prison under the prison term. By determination of the court, the offender upon release from the prison term either shall continue serving the remaining time under the community control sanction, as reduced under this division, or shall have the community control sanction terminated. (ii) If, at the time a prison term is imposed for a technical violation, the offender was serving a residential community control sanction imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code, the time spent serving the residential community control sanction shall be credited against the offender's reserved prison sentence, and the remaining time under that residential community control sanction and under the reserved prison sentence shall be reduced by the time that the offender spends in prison under the prison term. By determination of the court, the offender upon release from the prison term either shall continue serving the remaining time under the residential community control sanction, as reduced under this division, or shall have the residential community control sanction terminated. (3) The prison term, if any, imposed on a violator pursuant to this division and division (B)(1) of this section shall be within the range of prison terms described in this division and shall not exceed a prison term from the range of terms specified in the notice provided to the offender at the sentencing hearing pursuant to division (B)(4) of section 2929.19 of the Revised Code. The court may reduce the longer period of time that the offender is required to spend under the longer sanction, the more restrictive sanction, or a prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section by the time the offender successfully spent under the sanction that was initially imposed. Except as otherwise specified in this division, the prison term imposed under this division and division (B)(1) of this section shall be within the range of prison terms available as a definite term for the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed. If the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed is a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the prison term so imposed under this division shall be within the range of prison terms available as a minimum term for the offense under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (C) If an offender, for a significant period of time, fulfills the conditions of a sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code in an exemplary manner, the court may reduce the period of time under the sanction or impose a less restrictive sanction, but the court shall not permit the offender to violate any law or permit the offender to leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. (D)(1) If a court under division (A)(1) of this section imposes a condition of release under a community control sanction that requires the offender to submit to random drug testing, the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section may cause the offender to submit to random drug testing performed by a laboratory or entity that has entered into a contract with any of the governmental entities or officers authorized to enter into a contract with that laboratory or entity under section 341.26, 753.33, or 5120.63 of the Revised Code. (2) If no laboratory or entity described in division (D)(1) of this section has entered into a contract as specified in that division, the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall cause the offender to submit to random drug testing performed by a reputable public laboratory to determine whether the individual who is the subject of the drug test ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse. (3) A laboratory or entity that has entered into a contract pursuant to section 341.26, 753.33, or 5120.63 of the Revised Code shall perform the random drug tests under division (D)(1) of this section in accordance with the applicable standards that are included in the terms of that contract. A public laboratory shall perform the random drug tests under division (D)(2) of this section in accordance with the standards set forth in the policies and procedures established by the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to section 5120.63 of the Revised Code. An offender who is required under division (A)(1) of this section to submit to random drug testing as a condition of release under a community control sanction and whose test results indicate that the offender ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse shall pay the fee for the drug test if the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender requires payment of a fee. A laboratory or entity that performs the random drug testing on an offender under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section shall transmit the results of the drug test to the appropriate department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (E) As used in this section, "technical violation" means a violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fifth degree, or for a felony of the fourth degree that is not an offense of violence and is not a sexually oriented offense, and to which neither of the following applies: (1) The violation consists of a new criminal offense that is a felony or that is a misdemeanor other than a minor misdemeanor, and the violation is committed while under the community control sanction. (2) The violation consists of or includes the offender's articulated or demonstrated refusal to participate in the community control sanction imposed on the offender or any of its conditions, and the refusal demonstrates to the court that the offender has abandoned the objects of the community control sanction or condition. Sec. 2929.16. (A) Except as provided in this division, the court imposing a sentence for a felony upon an offender who is not required to serve a mandatory prison term may impose any community residential sanction or combination of community residential sanctions under this section. The court imposing a sentence for a fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(1) or (2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code or for a third degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(2) of that section may impose upon the offender, in addition to the mandatory term of local incarceration or mandatory prison term imposed under the applicable division, a community residential sanction or combination of community residential sanctions under this section, and the offender shall serve or satisfy the sanction or combination of sanctions after the offender has served the mandatory term of local incarceration or mandatory prison term required for the offense. Community residential sanctions include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(6) of this section, a term of up to six months at a community-based correctional facility that serves the county; (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(3) or (6) of this section and subject to division (D) of this section, a term of up to six months in a jail; (3) If the offender is convicted of a fourth degree felony OVI offense and is sentenced under division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, subject to division (D) of this section, a term of up to one year in a jail less the mandatory term of local incarceration of sixty or one hundred twenty consecutive days of imprisonment imposed pursuant to that division; (4) A term in a halfway house; (5) A term in an alternative residential facility; (6) If the offender is sentenced to a community control sanction and violates the conditions of the sanction, a new term of up to six months in a community-based correctional facility that serves the county, in a halfway house, a work-release program, or in a jail, which term shall be in addition to any other term imposed under this division. (B) The court that assigns any offender convicted of a felony to a residential sanction under this section may authorize the offender to be released so that the offender may seek or maintain employment, receive education or training, or receive treatment. A release pursuant to this division shall be only for the duration of time that is needed to fulfill the purpose of the release and for travel that reasonably is necessary to fulfill the purposes of the release. (C) If the court assigns an offender to a county jail that is not a minimum security misdemeanant jail in a county that has established a county jail industry program pursuant to section 5147.30 of the Revised Code, the court shall specify, as part of the sentence, whether the sheriff of that county may consider the offender for participation in the county jail industry program. During the offender's term in the county jail, the court shall retain jurisdiction to modify its specification upon a reassessment of the offender's qualifications for participation in the program. (D) If a court sentences an offender to a term in jail under division (A)(2), (3), or (6) of this section and if the sentence is imposed for a felony of the fourth or fifth degree that is not an offense of violence, the court may specify that it prefers that the offender serve the term in a minimum security jail established under section 341.34 or 753.21 of the Revised Code. If the court includes a specification of that type in the sentence and if the administrator of the appropriate minimum security jail or the designee of that administrator classifies the offender in accordance with section 341.34 or 753.21 of the Revised Code as a minimal security risk, the offender shall serve the term in the minimum security jail established under section 341.34 or 753.21 of the Revised Code. Absent a specification of that type and a finding of that type, the offender shall serve the term in a jail other than a minimum security jail established under section 341.34 or 753.21 of the Revised Code. (E) If a person who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony is sentenced to a community residential sanction as described in division (A) of this section, at the time of reception and at other times the person in charge of the operation of the community-based correctional facility, jail, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or other place at which the offender will serve the residential sanction determines to be appropriate, the person in charge of the operation of the community-based correctional facility, jail, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or other place may cause the convicted offender to be examined and tested for tuberculosis, HIV infection, hepatitis, including but not limited to hepatitis A, B, and C, and other contagious diseases. The person in charge of the operation of the community-based correctional facility, jail, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or other place at which the offender will serve the residential sanction may cause a convicted offender in the community-based correctional facility, jail, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or other place who refuses to be tested or treated for tuberculosis, HIV infection, hepatitis, including but not limited to hepatitis A, B, and C, or another contagious disease to be tested and treated involuntarily. Sec. 2929.25. (A)(1) Except as provided in sections 2929.22 and 2929.23 of the Revised Code or when a jail term is required by law, in sentencing an offender for a misdemeanor, other than a minor misdemeanor, the sentencing court may do either of the following: (a) Directly impose a sentence that consists of one or more community control sanctions authorized by section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. The court may impose any other conditions of release under a community control sanction that the court considers appropriate. If the court imposes a jail term upon the offender, the court may impose any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions in addition to the jail term. (b) Impose a jail term under section 2929.24 of the Revised Code from the range of jail terms authorized under that section for the offense, suspend all or a portion of the jail term imposed, and place the offender under a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. (2) The duration of all community control sanctions imposed upon an offender and in effect for an offender at any time shall not exceed five years. (3) At sentencing, if a court directly imposes a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) or (B) of this section, the court shall state the duration of the community control sanctions imposed and shall notify the offender that if any of the conditions of the community control sanctions are violated the court may do any of the following: (a) Impose a longer time under the same community control sanction if the total time under all of the offender's community control sanctions does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A)(2) of this section; (b) Impose a more restrictive community control sanction under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, but the court is not required to impose any particular sanction or sanctions; (c) Impose a definite jail term from the range of jail terms authorized for the offense under section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. (B) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) of this section, the sentencing court retains jurisdiction over the offender and the period of community control for the duration of the period of community control. Upon the motion of either party or on the court's own motion, the court, in the court's sole discretion and as the circumstances warrant, may modify the community control sanctions or conditions of release previously imposed, substitute a community control sanction or condition of release for another community control sanction or condition of release previously imposed, or impose an additional community control sanction or condition of release. (C)(1) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, the court shall place the offender under the general control and supervision of the court or of a department of probation in the jurisdiction that serves the court for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any of the conditions of the sanctions imposed. If the offender resides in another jurisdiction and a department of probation has been established to serve the municipal court or county court in that jurisdiction, the sentencing court may request the municipal court or the county court to receive the offender into the general control and supervision of that department of probation for purposes of reporting to the sentencing court a violation of any of the conditions of the sanctions imposed. The sentencing court retains jurisdiction over any offender whom it sentences for the duration of the sanction or sanctions imposed. (2) The sentencing court shall require as a condition of any community control sanction that the offender abide by the law and not leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. In the interests of doing justice, rehabilitating the offender, and ensuring the offender's good behavior, the court may impose additional requirements on the offender. The offender's compliance with the additional requirements also shall be a condition of the community control sanction imposed upon the offender. (D)(1) If the court imposing sentence upon an offender sentences the offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, and if the offender violates any of the conditions of the sanctions, the public or private person or entity that supervises or administers the program or activity that comprises the sanction shall report the violation directly to the sentencing court or to the department of probation or probation officer with general control and supervision over the offender. If the public or private person or entity reports the violation to the department of probation or probation officer, the department or officer shall report the violation to the sentencing court. (2) Except as provided in division (D)(3) of this section, if an offender violates any condition of a community control sanction, the sentencing court may impose upon the violator one or more of the following penalties: (a) A longer time under the same community control sanction if the total time under all of the community control sanctions imposed on the violator does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A)(2) of this section; (b) A more restrictive community control sanction; (c) A combination of community control sanctions, including a jail term or a term in a work-release program. (3) If an offender was acting pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2925.11 or a related provision under section 2925.12, 2925.14, or 2925.141 of the Revised Code and in so doing violated the conditions of a community control sanction based on a minor drug possession offense, as defined in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code, or violated section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall not impose any of the penalties described in division (D)(2) of this section based on the violation. (4) If the court imposes a jail term or a term in a work-release program upon a violator pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section, the total time spent in jail or in a work-release program for the misdemeanor offense and the violation of a condition of the community control sanction shall not exceed the maximum jail term or term in a work-release program available for the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed. The court may reduce the longer period of time that the violator is required to spend under the longer sanction or the more restrictive sanction imposed under division (D)(2) of this section by all or part of the time the violator successfully spent under the sanction that was initially imposed. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if an offender, for a significant period of time, fulfills the conditions of a community control sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code in an exemplary manner, the court may reduce the period of time under the community control sanction or impose a less restrictive community control sanction. Fulfilling the conditions of a community control sanction does not relieve the offender of a duty to make restitution under section 2929.28 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2967.131. (A) In addition to any other terms and conditions of a conditional pardon or parole, of transitional control, or of another form of authorized release from confinement in a state correctional institution that is granted to an individual and that involves the placement of the individual under the supervision of the adult parole authority, and in addition to any other sanctions of post-release control of a felon imposed under section 2967.28 of the Revised Code, the authority or, in the case of a conditional pardon, the governor shall include in the terms and conditions of the conditional pardon, parole, transitional control, or other form of authorized release or shall include as conditions of the post-release control the conditions that the individual or felon not leave the state without permission of the court or the individual's or felon's parole or probation officer and that the individual or felon abide by the law during the period of the individual's or felon's conditional pardon, parole, transitional control, other form of authorized release, or post-release control. (B)(1) The department of rehabilitation and correction, as a condition of parole or post-release control, may require that the individual or felon shall not ingest or be injected with a drug of abuse and shall submit to random drug testing as provided in divisions (B)(2), (3), and (4) of this section and that the results of the drug test indicate that the individual or felon did not ingest or was not injected with a drug of abuse. (2) If the adult parole authority has general control and supervision of an individual or felon who is required to submit to random drug testing as a condition of parole or post-release control under division (B)(1) of this section, the authority may cause the individual or felon to submit to random drug testing performed by a laboratory or entity that has entered into a contract with any of the governmental entities or officers authorized to enter into a contract with that laboratory or entity under section 341.26, 753.33, or 5120.63 of the Revised Code. (3) If no laboratory or entity described in division (B)(2) of this section has entered into a contract as specified in that division, the adult parole authority shall cause the individual or felon to submit to random drug testing performed by a reputable public laboratory to determine whether the individual or felon who is the subject of the drug test ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse. (4) If a laboratory or entity has entered into a contract with a governmental entity or officer as specified in division (B)(2) of this section, the laboratory or entity shall perform the random drug testing under division (B)(2) of this section in accordance with the applicable standards that are included in the terms of that contract. A public laboratory shall perform the random drug tests under division (B)(3) of this section in accordance with the standards set forth in the policies and procedures established by the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to section 5120.63 of the Revised Code. An individual or felon who is required under division (B)(1) of this section to submit to random drug testing as a condition of parole or post-release control and whose test results indicate that the individual or felon ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse shall pay the fee for the drug test if the adult parole authority requires payment of a fee. A laboratory or entity that performs the random drug testing on a parolee or releasee under division (B)(2) or (3) of this section shall transmit the results of the drug test to the adult parole authority. (C)(1) During the period of a conditional pardon or parole, of transitional control, or of another form of authorized release from confinement in a state correctional institution that is granted to an individual and that involves the placement of the individual under the supervision of the adult parole authority, and during a period of post-release control of a felon imposed under section 2967.28 of the Revised Code, authorized field officers of the authority who are engaged within the scope of their supervisory duties or responsibilities may search, with or without a warrant, the person of the individual or felon, the place of residence of the individual or felon, and a motor vehicle, another item of tangible or intangible personal property, or other real property in which the individual or felon has a right, title, or interest or for which the individual or felon has the express or implied permission of a person with a right, title, or interest to use, occupy, or possess, if any of the following apply: (a) The field officers have reasonable grounds to believe that the individual or felon has left the state, is not abiding by the law, or otherwise is not complying with the terms and conditions of the individual's or felon's conditional pardon, parole, transitional control, other form of authorized release, or post-release control. (b) The adult parole authority requires the individual's or felon's consent to searches as part of the terms and conditions of the conditional pardon or parole, of the transitional control, of the other form of authorized release from confinement in a state correctional institution that is granted to a person, or of the post-release control and that involves the placement of the person under the supervision of the adult parole authority, and the individual or felon agreed to those terms and conditions, provided that this division applies with respect to an individual only if the individual is a felon. (c) The individual or felon otherwise provides consent for the search, provided that this division applies with respect to an individual only if the individual is a felon. (2) The adult parole authority shall provide each individual who is granted a conditional pardon or parole, transitional control, or another form of authorized release from confinement in a state correctional institution and each felon who is under post-release control with a written notice that informs the individual or felon that authorized field officers of the authority who are engaged within the scope of their supervisory duties or responsibilities may conduct the types of searches described in division (C)(1) of this section during the period of the conditional pardon, parole, transitional control, other form of authorized release, or post-release control if any of the following apply: (a) The field officers have reasonable grounds to believe that the individual or felon has left the state, is not abiding by the law, or otherwise is not complying with the terms and conditions of the individual's or felon's conditional pardon, parole, transitional control, other form of authorized release, or post-release control. (b) The adult parole authority requires the individual's or felon's consent to searches as part of the terms and conditions of the conditional pardon or parole, of transitional control, of the other form of authorized release from confinement in a state correctional institution that is granted to a person, or of the post-release control and that involves the placement of the person under the supervision of the adult parole authority, and the individual or felon agreed to those terms and conditions, provided that this division applies with respect to an individual only if the individual is a felon. (c) The individual or felon otherwise provides consent for the search, provided that this division applies with respect to an individual only if the individual is a felon. (D) The department of rehabilitation and correction, as a condition of parole or post-release control, may require the individual or felon to do any of the following: (1) Seek and obtain employment or visit an employment service to review available positions or utilize other recommended resources in seeking employment, until employment is secured; (2) Participate in educational or vocational training, or in a workforce development program; (3) Participate in community service. Sec. 2967.15. (A)(A)(1) If an adult parole authority field officer has reasonable cause to believe that a person who is a parolee or releasee, who is under transitional control, or who is under another form of authorized release and who is under the supervision of the adult parole authority has violated or is violating the condition of a conditional pardon, parole, other form of authorized release, transitional control, or post-release control specified in division (A) of section 2967.131 of the Revised Code or any other term or condition of the person's conditional pardon, parole, other form of authorized release, transitional control, or post-release control, the field officer may arrest the person without a warrant or order a peace officer to arrest the person without a warrant. (2) The adult parole authority may arrest a person described above in a residence, including residences other than the approved residence of the person, if there is probable cause to believe that the person is residing at the residence or there is probable cause to believe that the person is currently present on the premises. (3) A person so arrested shall be confined in the jail of the county in which the person is arrested or in another facility designated by the chief of the adult parole authority until a determination is made regarding the person's release status. Upon making an arrest under this section, the arresting or supervising adult parole authority field officer promptly shall notify the superintendent of parole supervision or the superintendent's designee, in writing, that the person has been arrested and is in custody and submit an appropriate report of the reason for the arrest. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, prior to the revocation by the adult parole authority of a person's pardon, parole, or other release and prior to the imposition by the parole board or adult parole authority of a new prison term as a post-release control sanction for a person, the adult parole authority shall grant the person a hearing in accordance with rules adopted by the department of rehabilitation and correction under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The adult parole authority is not required to grant the person a hearing if the person is convicted of or pleads guilty to an offense that the person committed while released on a pardon, on parole, or another form of release, or on post-release control and upon which the revocation of the person's pardon, parole, other release, or post-release control is based. If a person who has been pardoned is found to be a violator of the conditions of the parolee's conditional pardon or commutation of sentence, the authority forthwith shall transmit to the governor its recommendation concerning that violation, and the violator shall be retained in custody until the governor issues an order concerning that violation. If the authority fails to make a determination of the case of a parolee or releasee alleged to be a violator of the terms and conditions of the parolee's or releasee's conditional pardon, parole, other release, or post-release control sanctions within a reasonable time, the parolee or releasee shall be released from custody under the same terms and conditions of the parolee's or releasee's original conditional pardon, parole, other release, or post-release control sanctions. (C)(1) If a person who is a parolee or releasee, who is under transitional control, or who is under another form of authorized release under the supervision of the adult parole authority absconds from supervision, the supervising adult parole authority field officer shall report that fact to the superintendent of parole supervision, in writing, and the authority shall declare that person to be a violator at large. Upon being advised of the apprehension and availability for return of a violator at large, the superintendent of parole supervision shall determine whether the violator at large should be restored to parole, transitional control, another form of authorized release, or post-release control. The time between the date on which a person who is a parolee or other releasee is declared to be a violator or violator at large and the date on which that person is returned to custody in this state under the immediate control of the adult parole authority shall not be counted as time served under the sentence imposed on that person or as a part of the term of post-release control. (2) A person who is under transitional control or who is under any form of authorized release under the supervision of the adult parole authority is considered to be in custody while under the transitional control or on release, and, if the person absconds from supervision, the person may be prosecuted for the offense of escape. (D) A person who is a parolee or releasee, who is under transitional control, or who is under another form of authorized release under the supervision of the adult parole authority and who has violated a term or condition of the person's conditional pardon, parole, transitional control, other form of authorized release, or post-release control shall be declared to be a violator if the person is committed to a correctional institution outside the state to serve a sentence imposed upon the person by a federal court or a court of another state or if the person otherwise leaves the state. (E) As used in this section, "peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 2929.15, 2929.16, 2929.25, 2967.131, and 2967.15 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Adult Parole Authority Enhancement Act. Section 4. Section 2929.15 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by H.B. 110, H.B. 281, and S.B. 288, all of the 134th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.